test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23_valkkee_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - valkkee ok: # Noun 'bål' n_23 valkkee, ES ok
     valkkee+N+Sg+Nom: valkkee
     valkkee+N+Sg+Gen: valkkeen
     valkkee+N+Sg+Par: valkkeeta
     valkkee+N+Sg+Tra: valkkeeksi
     valkkee+N+Sg+Abe: valkkeetta
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ine: valkkeessa
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ela: valkkeesta
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ill: valkkeesseen
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ade: valkkeela
     valkkee+N+Sg+Abl: valkkeelta
     valkkee+N+Sg+All: valkkeele
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ess: valkkeena
     valkkee+N+Pl+Nom: valkkeet
     valkkee+N+Pl+Gen: valkkeitten
     valkkee+N+Pl+Par: valkkeita
     valkkee+N+Pl+Tra: valkkeiksi
     valkkee+N+Pl+Abe: valkkeitta
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ine: valkkeissa
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ela: valkkeista
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ill: valkkeissiin
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ade: valkkeila
     valkkee+N+Pl+Abl: valkkeilta
     valkkee+N+Pl+All: valkkeile
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ess: valkkeina
     valkkee+N+Pl+Com: valkkeine
